Illinois, session 104th, HB760.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Benefits Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 76/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Community Benefits Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-480, eff. 8-8-03.)